.history/liheci_20251208024044.lexc
!!! liheci.lexc - MORPHOLOGICAL LEXICON !!!

Multichar_Symbols 
    +V/O +V_VV +V_MOD +V_PSEUDO +T_NN +T_MOD ^SEP +Masc +Fem +Neut +Sg +Pl +Du +Subj +Norm @V1@ @V2@ @V3@ @V4@ @V5@ @V6@ @V7@ @V8@ @V9@ @V10@ @V11@ @V12@ @V13@ @V14@ @V15@ @V16@ @V17@ @V18@ @V19@ @V20@ @V21@ @V22@ @V23@ @V24@ @V25@ @V26@ @V27@ @V28@ @V29@ @V30@ @V31@ @V32@ @V33@ @V34@ @V35@ @V36@ @V37@ @V38@ @V39@ @V40@ @V41@ @V42@ @V43@ @V44@ @V45@ @V46@ @V47@ @V48@ @V49@ @V50@ @V51@ @V52@ @V53@ @V54@ @V55@ @V56@ @V57@ @V58@ @V59@ @V60@ @V61@ @V62@ @V63@ @V64@ @V65@ @V66@ @V67@ @V68@ @V69@ @V70@ @V71@ @V72@ @V73@ @V74@ @V75@ @V76@ @V77@ @V78@ @V79@ @V80@ @V81@ @V82@ @V83@ @V84@ @V85@ @V86@ @V87@ @V88@ @V89@ @V90@ @V91@ @V92@ @V93@ @V94@ @V95@ @V96@ @V97@ @V98@ @V99@ @V100@ @V101@ @V102@ @V103@ @V104@ @V105@ @V106@ @V107@ @V108@ @V109@ @V110@ @V111@ @V112@ @V113@ @V114@ @V115@ @V116@ @V117@ @V118@ @V119@ @V120@ @V121@ @V122@ @V123@ @V124@ @V125@ @V126@ @V127@ @V128@

LEXICON Root
LEXICON Root
    @V1@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V1@:0 WholePath ;
    @V2@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V2@:0 WholePath ;
    @V3@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V3@:0 WholePath ;
    @V4@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V4@:0 WholePath ;
    @V5@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V5@:0 WholePath ;
    @V6@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V6@:0 WholePath ;
    @V7@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V7@:0 WholePath ;
    @V8@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V8@:0 WholePath ;
    @V9@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V9@:0 WholePath ;
    @V10@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V10@:0 WholePath ;
    @V11@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V11@:0 WholePath ;
    @V12@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V12@:0 WholePath ;
    @V13@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V13@:0 WholePath ;
    @V14@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V14@:0 WholePath ;
    @V15@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V15@:0 WholePath ;
    @V16@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V16@:0 WholePath ;
    @V17@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V17@:0 WholePath ;
    @V18@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V18@:0 WholePath ;
    @V19@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V19@:0 WholePath ;
    @V20@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V20@:0 WholePath ;
    @V21@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V21@:0 WholePath ;
    @V22@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V22@:0 WholePath ;
    @V23@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V23@:0 WholePath ;
    @V24@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V24@:0 WholePath ;
    @V25@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V25@:0 WholePath ;
    @V26@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V26@:0 WholePath ;
    @V27@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V27@:0 WholePath ;
    @V28@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V28@:0 WholePath ;
    @V29@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V29@:0 WholePath ;
    @V30@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V30@:0 WholePath ;
    @V31@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V31@:0 WholePath ;
    @V32@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V32@:0 WholePath ;
    @V33@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V33@:0 WholePath ;
    @V34@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V34@:0 WholePath ;
    @V35@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V35@:0 WholePath ;
    @V36@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V36@:0 WholePath ;
    @V37@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V37@:0 WholePath ;
    @V38@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V38@:0 WholePath ;
    @V39@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V39@:0 WholePath ;
    @V40@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V40@:0 WholePath ;
    @V41@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V41@:0 WholePath ;
    @V42@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V42@:0 WholePath ;
    @V43@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V43@:0 WholePath ;
    @V44@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V44@:0 WholePath ;
    @V45@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V45@:0 WholePath ;
    @V46@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V46@:0 WholePath ;
    @V47@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V47@:0 WholePath ;
    @V48@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V48@:0 WholePath ;
    @V49@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V49@:0 WholePath ;
    @V50@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V50@:0 WholePath ;
    @V51@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V51@:0 WholePath ;
    @V52@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V52@:0 WholePath ;
    @V53@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V53@:0 WholePath ;
    @V54@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V54@:0 WholePath ;
    @V55@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V55@:0 WholePath ;
    @V56@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V56@:0 WholePath ;
    @V57@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V57@:0 WholePath ;
    @V58@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V58@:0 WholePath ;
    @V59@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V59@:0 WholePath ;
    @V60@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V60@:0 WholePath ;
    @V61@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V61@:0 WholePath ;
    @V62@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V62@:0 WholePath ;
    @V63@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V63@:0 WholePath ;
    @V64@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V64@:0 WholePath ;
    @V65@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V65@:0 WholePath ;
    @V66@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V66@:0 WholePath ;
    @V67@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V67@:0 WholePath ;
    @V68@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V68@:0 WholePath ;
    @V69@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V69@:0 WholePath ;
    @V70@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V70@:0 WholePath ;
    @V71@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V71@:0 WholePath ;
    @V72@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V72@:0 WholePath ;
    @V73@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V73@:0 WholePath ;
    @V74@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V74@:0 WholePath ;
    @V75@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V75@:0 WholePath ;
    @V76@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V76@:0 WholePath ;
    @V77@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V77@:0 WholePath ;
    @V78@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V78@:0 WholePath ;
    @V79@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V79@:0 WholePath ;
    @V80@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V80@:0 WholePath ;
    @V81@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V81@:0 WholePath ;
    @V82@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V82@:0 WholePath ;
    @V83@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V83@:0 WholePath ;
    @V84@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V84@:0 WholePath ;
    @V85@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V85@:0 WholePath ;
    @V86@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V86@:0 WholePath ;
    @V87@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V87@:0 WholePath ;
    @V88@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V88@:0 WholePath ;
    @V89@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V89@:0 WholePath ;
    @V90@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V90@:0 WholePath ;
    @V91@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V91@:0 WholePath ;
    @V92@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V92@:0 WholePath ;
    @V93@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V93@:0 WholePath ;
    @V94@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V94@:0 WholePath ;
    @V95@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V95@:0 WholePath ;
    @V96@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V96@:0 WholePath ;
    @V97@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V97@:0 WholePath ;
    @V98@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V98@:0 WholePath ;
    @V99@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V99@:0 WholePath ;
    @V100@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V100@:0 WholePath ;
    @V101@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V101@:0 WholePath ;
    @V102@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V102@:0 WholePath ;
    @V103@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V103@:0 WholePath ;
    @V104@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V104@:0 WholePath ;
    @V105@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V105@:0 WholePath ;
    @V106@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V106@:0 WholePath ;
    @V107@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V107@:0 WholePath ;
    @V108@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V108@:0 WholePath ;
    @V109@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V109@:0 WholePath ;
    @V110@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V110@:0 WholePath ;
    @V111@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V111@:0 WholePath ;
    @V112@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V112@:0 WholePath ;
    @V113@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V113@:0 WholePath ;
    @V114@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V114@:0 WholePath ;
    @V115@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V115@:0 WholePath ;
    @V116@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V116@:0 WholePath ;
    @V117@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V117@:0 WholePath ;
    @V118@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V118@:0 WholePath ;
    @V119@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V119@:0 WholePath ;
    @V120@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V120@:0 WholePath ;
    @V121@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V121@:0 WholePath ;
    @V122@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V122@:0 WholePath ;
    @V123@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V123@:0 WholePath ;
    @V124@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V124@:0 WholePath ;
    @V125@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V125@:0 WholePath ;
    @V126@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V126@:0 WholePath ;
    @V127@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V127@:0 WholePath ;
    @V128@:0 SplitPath ;
    @V128@:0 WholePath ;

LEXICON SplitPath
LEXICON WholePath
LEXICON SplitEndSep

LEXICON SplitPath
    睡:睡 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    洗:洗 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    吃:吃 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    刷:刷 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    洗:洗 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    走:走 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    跑:跑 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    散:散 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    上:上 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    理:理 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    搬:搬 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    起:起 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    看:看 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    写:写 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    开:开 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    关:关 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    做:做 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    打:打 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    抽:抽 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    见:见 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    帮:帮 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    聊:聊 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    说:说 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    吵:吵 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    打:打 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    打:打 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    生:生 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    发:发 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    道:道 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    道:道 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    拜:拜 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    握:握 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    鼓:鼓 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    捣:捣 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    开:开 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    谈:谈 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    撒:撒 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    吹:吹 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    告:告 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    请:请 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    结:结 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    离:离 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    订:订 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    分:分 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    吃:吃 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    伤:伤 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    放:放 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    担:担 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    灰:灰 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    操:操 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    动:动 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    上:上 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    下:下 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    上:上 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    上:上 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    下:下 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    请:请 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    放:放 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    考:考 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    毕:毕 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    留:留 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    报:报 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    辞:辞 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    开:开 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    发:发 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    值:值 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    加:加 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    出:出 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    生:生 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    看:看 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    住:住 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    出:出 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    打:打 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    输:输 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    挂:挂 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    把:把 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    减:减 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    鞠:鞠 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    敬:敬 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    站:站 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    吃:吃 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    吃:吃 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    受:受 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    跳:跳 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    唱:唱 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    游:游 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    划:划 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    钓:钓 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    滑:滑 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    签:签 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    排:排 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    打:打 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    戒:戒 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    回:回 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    死:死 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    挑:挑 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    受:受 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    散:散 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    扫:扫 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    领:领 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    送:送 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    拌:拌 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    叹:叹 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    丢:丢 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    接:接 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    受:受 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    挨:挨 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    干:干 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    革:革 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    造:造 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    退:退 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    出:出 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    把:把 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    施:施 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    倒:倒 +V_VV SplitEndSep ;
    提:提 +V_PSEUDO SplitEndSep ;
    出:出 +V_PSEUDO SplitEndSep ;
    将:将 +V_PSEUDO SplitEndSep ;
    学:学 +V_PSEUDO SplitEndSep ;
    小:小 +V_MOD SplitEndSep ;
    大:大 +V_MOD SplitEndSep ;
    军:军 +V_MOD SplitEndSep ;
    体:体 +V_MOD SplitEndSep ;
    同:同 +V_MOD SplitEndSep ;
    暂:暂 +V_MOD SplitEndSep ;
    慷:慷 +V_PSEUDO SplitEndSep ;
    幽:幽 +V_PSEUDO SplitEndSep ;
    滑:滑 +V_PSEUDO SplitEndSep ;
